Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4221.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16287. (1) The department, in consultation with a board, shall promulgate rules to implement sections 16284 and 16285. (2) Rules promulgated by the department in consultation with the Michigan board of veterinary medicine under this section are subject to section 18818. Sec. 18811. (1) A person Subject to section 18818, an individual shall not engage in the practice of veterinary medicine unless licensed or otherwise authorized by this article. (2) After July 1, 1979, an An individual shall not practice as a veterinary technician without a license. (3) A veterinary technician shall not diagnose animal diseases, prescribe medical or surgical treatment, or perform as a surgeon. (4) The following words, titles, or letters or a combination thereof, of words, titles, or letters, with or without qualifying words or phrases, are restricted in use only to those persons individuals authorized under this part to use the terms and in a way prescribed in this part: "veterinary", "veterinarian", "veterinary doctor", "veterinary surgeon", "doctor of veterinary medicine", "v.m.d.", "d.v.m.", "animal technician", or "animal technologist". Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01935'25) or House Bill No. 4220 (request no. H01935'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.